Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-814
Commission; employees; compensation.

The Commission of Industrial Relations may employ such expert accountants, engineers, stenographers, attorneys, and other employees as the commission finds necessary. Officers and employees of the commission, whose salaries are not fixed by law, shall be paid such compensation as may be fixed by the commission with the approval of the Governor.

Laws 1947, c. 178, § 14, p. 591;

Laws 1955, c. 78, § 2, p. 233;

Laws 1974, LB 819, § 8.